New York, session 2025-2026, S5189.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public authorities law is amended by adding a new 2 section 1874 to read as follows: 3 § 1874. Comprehensive electric vehicle fast charging station implemen- 4 tation plan. 1. The authority, in consultation with the New York power 5 authority, the department of transportation, the department of environ- 6 mental conservation, the department of public service and the Fast 7 Charge NY working group established pursuant to subdivision five of this 8 section shall, no later than twenty-four months after the effective date 9 of this section, develop a comprehensive electric vehicle fast charging 10 station implementation plan to facilitate the deployment of fast elec- 11 tric vehicle charging stations statewide. Such comprehensive electric 12 vehicle fast charging plan shall incorporate the findings of the needs 13 evaluation set forth in part QQ of chapter fifty-eight of the laws of 14 two thousand twenty-four. As used in this section, the term "the plan" 15 shall mean the comprehensive electric vehicle fast charging station 16 implementation plan developed pursuant to this subdivision. 17 2. Such plan shall at a minimum include: 18 (a) methods to increase public availability; 19 (b) geographic information pertaining to current fast charger deploy- 20 ment including specific information relating to the fast chargers being 21 deployed. Such information shall include, but not be limited to the 22 number of ports and charging capacity; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01631-02-5 S. 5189 2 1 (c) the number and location of fast chargers currently in development 2 and estimated future needs for the next five years; 3 (d) each state and utility-administered program currently, or within 4 the prior two years, providing funding or oversight of electrical vehi- 5 cle charging stations, including but not limited to Charge NY and Charge 6 Ready NY; 7 (e) methods to prevent overlap of state programs and maximize fast 8 charger coverage; 9 (f) guidance to municipalities for technical and planning assistance 10 to facilitate the adoption of curbside charging; 11 (g) support and guidance to facilitate the deployment of charging 12 stations for existing commercial fleets to help offset air pollution in 13 disadvantaged communities, as defined in section 75-0101 of the environ- 14 mental conservation law; 15 (h) areas currently underserved by fast charger coverage; and 16 (i) requirements for compliance with labor standards for the manufac- 17 ture, construction, installation and maintenance of fast charging 18 stations, including but not limited to Buy American provisions for 19 component parts and manufacture of infrastructure related to the charg- 20 ing stations, and prevailing wage pursuant to section two hundred twenty 21 of the labor law for construction, installation and maintenance of fast 22 charging stations. 23 3. Once completed, the authority shall publish the plan on its website 24 and provide for a thirty-day public comment period prior to adoption of 25 such plan. 26 4. The authority shall publish a final report following adoption of 27 the plan that shall include guidance for the deployment of electric 28 vehicle fast charging stations statewide. 29 5. (a) The authority shall establish a "Fast Charge NY working group" 30 consisting of thirteen members, including one member representing each 31 statewide municipal organization; two members representing environmental 32 justice groups; two members representing statewide environmental groups; 33 two members representing public utilities; and two members representing 34 charging station developers, which shall include a New York based devel- 35 oper. Such working group members shall be appointed as follows: five 36 members shall be appointed by the governor; four members shall be 37 appointed by the temporary president of the senate and four members 38 shall be appointed by the speaker of the assembly. 39 (b) Members of the working group shall be reimbursed for their neces- 40 sary and actual expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as 41 members of the working group. 42 6. The authority shall update the plan annually. 43 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.